Hawaii statutes.
[§481J-3] Disclaimers void;
authorized waivers; exemptions; "as is" sales. (a) Any
agreement entered into by a consumer for the purchase of a used motor vehicle
that waives, limits, or disclaims any of the rights set forth in section 481J-2
shall be void as contrary to public policy. If a dealer fails to give the
written warranty required by this chapter, the dealer nevertheless shall be
deemed to have given the warranty as a matter of law.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the
consumer may waive a warranty required pursuant to this chapter only as to a
particular defect or malfunction which the dealer has disclosed to the
consumer. No such waiver shall be effective unless such waiver:

(1) Is in writing;

(2) Is conspicuous and is in plain language;

(3) Identifies the particular disclosed defect or
malfunction in the used motor vehicle for which the warranty is to be waived;

(4) States what warranty, if any, shall apply to the
disclosed defect or malfunction; and

(5) Is signed by both the consumer and the dealer
prior to sale.

(c) This chapter shall not apply to:

(1) Used motor vehicles sold for less than $1,500;

(2) Used motor vehicles with over seventy-five
thousand miles at the time of sale if the mileage is indicated in writing at
the time of sale;

(3) Used motor vehicles that are five years of age or
older, calculated from the first day in January of the designated model year of
the vehicle;

(4) Vehicles that have been custom-built or modified
for show purposes or racing; or

(5) Vehicles which are inoperable and a total loss.
For the purpose of this paragraph, a vehicle is a "total loss" only
if there is material damage to the vehicle's frame, unitized structure, or
suspension system, and the projected cost of repairing the damage exceeds the
market value of the vehicle at the time of the incident causing it to be
declared a total loss.

(d) A used motor vehicle may be sold "as
is" by a dealer only if it falls within the exemptions set out in this
section. No "as is" disclaimer by a dealer shall be enforceable
unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) A disclaimer shall appear on the front page of
the contract of sale, which shall read as follows:

"AS
IS"

THIS VEHICLE IS SOLD "AS IS". YOU
WILL HAVE TO PAY FOR ANY REPAIRS NEEDED AFTER SALE. IF WE HAVE MADE ANY
PROMISES TO YOU, THE LAW SAYS WE MUST KEEP OUR PROMISES, EVEN IF WE SELL
"AS IS". TO PROTECT YOURSELF, ASK US TO PUT ALL PROMISES IN WRITING.

(2) The text of the disclaimer shall be printed in
twelve-point boldface type, except the heading, which shall be in sixteen-point
extra boldface type. The entire notice shall be boxed.

(3) The consumer shall sign the consumer's name and
the date within the box containing the disclaimer prior to sale. A copy of the
signed disclaimer shall be kept by the dealer for a two-year period from the
date of the consumer's signature.

(e) An "as is" sale of a used motor
vehicle waives implied warranties but shall not waive any express warranties,
either oral or written, upon which the consumer relied in entering into the
transaction.

(f) In selling or offering to sell any used
motor vehicle, and in providing the express warranty required by this chapter,
a dealer shall comply in all respects with the Federal Trade Commission's
"Used Motor Vehicle Trade Regulation Rule", 16 Code of Federal
Regulations, part 455. [L 1994, c 224, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next